Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 1 Substantive Provisions
5-5-114. Resolution or ordinance prohibiting or restricting display of flag prohibited — Resolution or ordinance regulating manner or placement of flag.

Except as provided in subsection (b), a county legislative body shall not adopt or enforce a resolution or ordinance that prohibits or restricts, or has the effect of prohibiting or restricting, a property owner from displaying a flag of the United States of America, a flag of the state of Tennessee, the MIA/POW flag, or an official or replica flag of any branch of the United States armed forces on the property owner's property.

A county legislative body may adopt and enforce a resolution or ordinance that reasonably regulates the manner and placement of the display of a flag of the United States of America, a flag of the state of Tennessee, the MIA/POW flag, or an official or replica flag of any branch of the United States armed forces only when necessary to promote public health and safety.

Acts 2018, ch. 857, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 5-5-114 (Code 1858, § 821 (deriv. Acts 1796 (July), ch. 3, § 2); Shan., § 1149; mod. Code 1932, § 1910; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 1910; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-516), concerning notice to the public for election of county officers, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 871, § 4, effective May 6, 2008.

For the Preamble to the act concerning local government restrictions on flag displays, please see Acts 2018, ch. 857.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 857, § 3. May 3, 2018.

5-5-115. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 5-5-115 (Code 1858, § 819 (deriv. Acts 1796 (July), ch. 3, § 1; 1841-1842, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2); Shan., § 1146; Code 1932, § 1907; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-517), concerning the conduct of elections for county officers, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 871, § 4, effective May 6, 2008.

5-5-116. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 5-5-116 (Acts 1887, ch. 180, § 1; Shan., § 1147; Code 1932, § 1908; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 15; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-518), concerning the recording of votes for county officers, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 871, § 4, effective May 6, 2008.

5-5-117. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 5-5-117 (Code 1858, § 820 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 101, § 1); Shan., § 1148; Code 1932, § 1909; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-519), concerning postponement of elections for county officers, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 871, § 4, effective May 6, 2008.

5-5-118. Powers and duties — Voting railroad stock.

The county legislative bodies have the power, and it is their duty, through an agent or proxy, to vote the stock of the county in any railroad, in all elections of officers and directors in such railroad.

Acts 1875, ch. 70, § 4; Shan., § 6020; mod. Code 1932, § 10219; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-520.

5-5-119. Powers and duties — Supervision of local improvements.

The establishment and general supervision of roads and ferries, watercourses and local improvements, are entrusted to the county legislative body, as provided in title 54, chapters 7 and 9-14.

Code 1858, § 4206 (deriv. Acts 1804, ch. 1; 1835-1836, ch. 29, § 1); Shan., § 6038; Code 1932, § 10235; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-521.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bridges, § 4; 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 11; 23 Tenn. Juris., Streets and Highways, § 3.

5-5-120. Powers and duties — Commissioners for local improvements.

The county legislative bodies have power to appoint commissioners for towns, toll bridges and other public improvements, and to fill all vacancies that may at any time occur among the commissioners, as prescribed.

Code 1858, § 4207 (deriv. Acts 1817, ch. 136, § 2; 1835-1836, ch. 29, § 12); Shan., § 6039; Code 1932, § 10236; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-522.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 11.

5-5-121. Powers and duties — Control of public buildings.

The county legislative bodies have power to erect or control, and dispose of public county buildings, as provided in chapter 7 of this title.

Code 1858, § 4214; Shan., § 6044; Code 1932, § 10241; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-523.

Cross-References. Lease of buildings and facilities authorized, title 12, ch. 2, part 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Counties, § 11.

Attorney General Opinions. County legislative bodies' responsibility to provide court facilities, OAG 99-049, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 50 (3/2/99).

5-5-122. Powers and duties — Tax levy for public buildings.

The county legislative bodies have full power to lay any tax, from time to time, and, at any time that they may think proper, to build, extend or repair, any courthouse, jail or public office for county purposes.

Code 1858, § 4211 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 99, § 1); Shan., § 6041; mod. Code 1932, § 10238; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-524.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Special Assessments, § 3.

Attorney General Opinions. Tax levy for public buildings may be levied by a county as a litigation tax; however, the tax must be levied in the same manner and in an amount not to exceed the amount of litigation taxes levied by the state, OAG 03-006, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 6 (1/22/03).

5-5-123. Powers and duties — Time for county tax levy.

The county legislative body is required, at the first term in every year, to impose, and provide for the collection of, the tax for county purposes, and fix the rate thereof; but if it omits such duty at the first session, it shall be performed at the next regular session.

Code 1858, § 4193 (deriv. Acts 1837-1838, ch. 135, § 2); Shan., § 6013; Code 1932, § 10212; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 15; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-525.

Cross-References. General revenue authority of counties, title 67, ch. 1, part 6.

Attorney General Opinions. Tax levy for public buildings may be levied by a county as a litigation tax; however, the tax must be levied in the same manner and in an amount not to exceed the amount of litigation taxes levied by the state, OAG 03-006, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 6 (1/22/03).

5-5-124. Powers and duties — Correction of tax errors.

The county legislative bodies may release from double taxes, when they have been incurred, and correct errors in the tax list.

Code 1858, § 4213 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 171, § 1); Shan., § 6043; Code 1932, § 10240; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-526.

5-5-125. Powers and duties — Exemptions from roadwork, peddling requirements.

The county legislative bodies may exempt any indigent, decrepit, or other persons unable by manual labor or physical exertion to obtain a living, from working on the public roads as provided in § 71-5-2302, or allow persons to hawk and peddle, without license, as provided in § 67-4-102.

Code 1858, § 4212 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 97); Shan., § 6042; Code 1932, § 10239; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 15; 1979, ch. 23, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-527.

5-5-126. Powers and duties — Oaths of witnesses.

Power is given to members of the county legislative body to administer an oath or affirmation, as provided by law for witnesses appearing in a court of record of this state to give testimony in such court, when a witness is called to give testimony before the county legislative body or any committee of the county legislative body that has been created by a duly adopted resolution of the county legislative body.

Acts 1979, ch. 71, § 1; T.C.A., § 5-528.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of Carter County planning commission to require testimony under oath. OAG 12-105, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 109 (11/26/12).

5-5-127. Powers and duties — Alcoholic beverages in parks, etc.

A county may by resolution of its county legislative body prohibit or restrict the consumption of any alcoholic beverage or beer in public parks or recreation areas that are not within the corporate boundaries of a municipality. Such areas shall be prominently posted by the county in order to give the public reasonable notice.

A violation of such a resolution shall upon conviction be a Class A misdemeanor and be punishable by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00).

Acts 1984, ch. 976, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The misdemeanor provisions in this section may have been affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§ 39-11-114, 40-35-110 and 40-35-111.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.